Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.080

Gambling commission—Administrator—Staff—Rules and regulations—Service contracts.

The commission shall employ a full time director, who shall be the administrator for the commission in carrying out its powers and duties and who shall issue rules and regulations adopted by the commission governing the activities authorized hereunder and shall supervise commission employees in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. In addition, the director shall employ a deputy director, not more than three assistant directors, together with such investigators and enforcement officers and such staff as the commission determines is necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The director, the deputy director, the assistant directors, and personnel occupying positions requiring the performing of undercover investigative work shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, as now law or hereafter amended. Neither the director nor any commission employee working therefor shall be an officer or manager of any bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, or of any organization which conducts gambling activity in this state.

The director, subject to the approval of the commission, is authorized to enter into agreements on behalf of the commission for mutual assistance and services, based upon actual costs, with any state or federal agency or with any city, town, or county, and such state or local agency is authorized to enter into such an agreement with the commission. If a needed service is not available from another agency of state government within a reasonable time, the director may obtain that service from private industry.

[ 1994 c 218 s 14; 1981 c 139 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 7; 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 155: See note following RCW 9.46.010.